test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AN_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AN_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AN_STEM_2

     dlán+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dláanaa
     dlán+V+INDIRECT+PAST: dláanaan
     dlán+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dláanaas
     dlán+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dláanaa.ang
     dlán+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dláan'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+CERTAIN+PAST: dláan'ahlanggan
     dlán+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dláan'ahlanggiinii
     dlán+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dláan'ahlans
     dlán+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: dláanaa'ahlang
     dlán+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dláanaa'ahlanggaa
     dlán+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dláanaa'ahlanggang
     dlán+V+REFLEXIVE: dláan'ahl
